Washington statutes.
RCW 18.185.260

Bail bond recovery agents—Prelicense training/testing requirements—Continuing education requirements—Rules.

(1) The director shall adopt rules establishing prelicense training and testing requirements for bail bond recovery agents, which shall include no less than thirty-two hours of field operations classes. The director may establish, by rule, continuing education and recertification requirements for bail bond recovery agents.

(2) The director or the director's designee, with the advice of law enforcement agencies and associations, the criminal justice training commission, prosecutors' associations, or such other entities as may be appropriate, shall consult with representatives of the bail bond industry and associations before adopting or amending the prelicensing training, testing, and continuing education and recertification requirements of this section and shall establish minimum exam standards necessary for a bail bond recovery agent to qualify for licensure or endorsement.

(3) The standards must include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) A minimum level of education or experience appropriate for performing the duties of a bail bond recovery agent;

(b) A minimum level of knowledge in relevant areas of criminal and civil law;

(c) A minimum level of knowledge regarding the appropriate use of force and different degrees of the use of force; and

(d) Adequate training of the use of firearms from the criminal justice training commission, from an instructor who has been trained or certified by the criminal justice training commission, or from another entity approved by the director.

(4) The legislature does not intend, and nothing in this chapter shall be construed to restrict or limit in any way the powers of bail bond agents as recognized in and derived from the United States supreme court case of Taylor v. Taintor, 16 Wall. 366 (1872).

[ 2008 c 105 s 6; 2004 c 186 s 5.]

NOTES:

Legislative recognition—2004 c 186: See note following RCW 18.185.010.